Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.122.040

Awards.

The office may award aerospace training student loans to eligible students from the funds available in the aerospace training student loan account for this program. The amount of the student loan awarded an individual may not exceed tuition and fees for the program of study.

[ 2012 c 50 s 6; 2011 c 8 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 50 ss 4-8: See note following RCW 28B.122.010.

Finding—Intent—2012 c 50: See note following RCW 28B.50.903.